Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 5
ELECTRONIC VOTING EQUIPMENT

1-7-501. Judges open ballot box first.

Immediately before proclamation is made of the opening of the polls, the election judges shall open the ballot box in the presence of those assembled and shall turn it upside down so as to empty it of anything that may be in it and then shall lock it securely. No ballot box shall be reopened until the time for counting the ballots or ballot cards therein.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 745, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-501 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-502. Elector given only one ballot or ballot card. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 745, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 185, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-503. Manner of voting.

Each eligible elector, upon receiving a ballot, shall immediately proceed unaccompanied to one of the voting booths provided. To cast a vote, the eligible elector shall clearly fill the oval, connect the arrow, or otherwise appropriately mark the name of the candidate or the names of the joint candidates of the elector's choice for each office to be filled. In the case of a ballot issue, the elector shall clearly fill the oval, connect the arrow, or otherwise appropriately mark the appropriate place opposite the answer that the elector desires to give. Before leaving the voting booth, the eligible elector, without displaying the marks thereon, shall place the ballot in the privacy envelope so that the contents of the ballot or ballot card are concealed and shall place the envelope and the ballot or ballot card in the ballot box.

Each eligible elector who has prepared the ballot and is ready to vote shall then leave the voting booth and approach the election judges having charge of the ballot box. The eligible elector shall give his or her name to one of the election judges. The elector shall, in full view of the election judges, deposit the ballot or ballot card in the ballot box, with the official endorsement on the ballot or ballot card facing upward.

In precincts which use electronic voting equipment in which voting is by a method other than a ballot, each voter shall be listed by name in the pollbook and shall be given an entry card to the electronic voting device.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (1) or (2) of this section to the contrary, at a polling location at which a ballot marking device, as defined in section 1-5-702 (2.5), is available for accessible voting, the election judge in charge of the ballot box shall deposit every elector's ballot card in the ballot box.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 745, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 185, § 5, effective August 6.

L. 2007:

(4) added, p. 1979, § 27, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 685, § 29, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(4) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 722, § 72, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-503 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For ballots for general and congressional vacancy elections, see § 1-5-403; for method of counting paper ballots, see § 1-7-307; for ballots improperly marked, see § 1-7-309.

(2) In 2013, subsection (4) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-504. Spoiled ballot or ballot card.

In polling locations in which voting is on a ballot or ballot card, no person, except an election judge as authorized by the designated election official, shall remove a spoiled ballot or ballot card from the polling location before the close of the polls. Any eligible elector who spoils a ballot or ballot card may successively obtain others, one at a time, not exceeding three in all, upon returning each spoiled ballot or ballot card. The spoiled ballots or ballot cards thus returned shall be immediately canceled and shall be preserved and returned to the designated election official as provided in section 1-7-701. Nothing in this section prohibits an elector from obtaining a replacement ballot pursuant to section 1-7.5-107.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 746, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 722, § 73, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-504 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-505. Close of polls - security of voting machinery.

After the polls have been closed, the election judges shall secure the vote recorders or the voting devices, or both, against further use.

and (3) Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 746, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1767, § 9, effective June 6; (2) amended, p. 1421, § 77, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 586, § 26, effective April 30.

L. 2013:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 722, § 74, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

(2) and (3) repealed, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1611, § 21, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-505 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (2) and (3) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-506. Electronic vote-counting - test. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 747, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 840, § 59, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1746, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1634, § 16, effective June 7.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1358, § 19, effective May 28.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1425, § 56, effective June 6; entire section repealed, p. 1461, § 56, effective June 6.

1-7-506.5. Testing of voting systems and tabulating equipment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1358, § 20, effective May 28.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1425, § 56, effective June 6; entire section repealed, p. 1461, § 56, effective June 6.

1-7-507. Electronic vote-counting - procedure.

All proceedings at the counting centers shall be under the direction of the designated election official and the representatives of the political parties, if a partisan election, or watchers, if a nonpartisan election. No persons, except those authorized for the purpose, shall touch any ballot, ballot card, "prom" or other electronic device, or return.

All persons who are engaged in the processing and counting of the ballots or recorded precinct votes shall be deputized in writing and take an oath that they will faithfully perform their assigned duties.

The return printed by the electronic vote-tabulating equipment, to which have been added write-in votes, shall, when certified by the designated election official, constitute the official return of each precinct. The designated election official may, from time to time, release unofficial returns. Upon completion of the count, the official returns shall be open to the public.

Repealed.

Write-in ballots may be counted by the election judges or at the counting centers.

If a software or hardware malfunction makes it impossible to count all or a part of the ballots with electronic vote-tabulating equipment, the secretary of state, after consultation with the designated election official, may permit the designated election official to direct that such ballots be counted manually, following as far as practicable the provisions governing the counting of paper ballots as provided in section 1-7-307.

The receiving, opening, and preservation of the transfer boxes and their contents shall be the responsibility of the designated election official, who shall provide adequate personnel and facilities to assure accurate and complete election results. Any indication of tampering with the ballots, ballot card, or other fraudulent action shall be immediately reported to the district attorney, who shall immediately investigate the action and report the findings in writing within ten days to the designated election official and shall prosecute to the full extent of the law any person or persons responsible for the fraudulent action.

Repealed. / (Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1359, § 21, effective January 1, 2006.)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 748, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

(7) and (8) amended and (8) repealed, pp. 1359, 1361, 1213, §§ 21, 30, 31, 108, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2007:

(4) amended, p. 1779, § 16, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(5) amended and (4) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 723, § 75, effective May 10.

L. 2022:

(6) amended, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2281, § 12, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-507 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

(1) For counting procedure for paper ballots, see § 1-7-307; for counting procedure in use of voting machines, see §§ 1-7-406 and 1-7-505.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsections (7) and (8) and repealing subsection (8), see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

(3) In 2013, subsection (5) was amended and subsection (4) was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(4) For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-7-508. Determination of improperly marked ballots.

If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot properly be counted by the electronic vote-counting equipment, a true duplicate copy shall be made of the damaged ballot in the presence of two witnesses. The duplicate ballot shall be substituted for the damaged ballot. Every duplicate ballot shall be clearly labeled as such and shall bear a serial number which shall be recorded on the damaged ballot.

Votes cast for an office to be filled or a ballot question or ballot issue to be decided shall not be counted if a voter marks more names than there are persons to be elected to an office or if for any reason it is impossible to determine the elector's choice of candidate or vote concerning the ballot question or ballot issue; except that an elector's rankings of multiple candidates in an election using instant runoff voting shall be recorded and counted in accordance with section 1-7-1003 and rules promulgated by the secretary of state. A defective or an incomplete mark on any ballot in a proper place shall be counted if no other mark is on the ballot indicating an intention to vote for some other candidate or ballot question or ballot issue.

No ballot shall be counted unless it has the official endorsement required by section 1-5-407 (1).

Ballots not counted because of the election judges' inability to determine the elector's intent for all candidates and ballot issues shall be marked "defective" on the back, banded together, separated from the other ballots, and preserved by the designated election official pursuant to section 1-7-801.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 749, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, pp. 1359, 1213, §§ 22, 108, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 686, § 30, effective May 17.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2421, § 12, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 2004.

1-7-509. Electronic and electromechanical vote counting - testing of equipment required - rules.

An electronic or electromechanical voting system shall be tested at the conclusion of maintenance and testing. The tests shall be sufficient to determine that the voting system is properly programmed, the election is correctly defined on the voting system, and all of the voting system's input, output, and communication devices are working properly.

The designated election official shall conduct at least three tests on all electronic and electromagnetic voting equipment, including a hardware test, a public logic and accuracy test conducted in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, and a postelection test or audit conducted in accordance with rules promulgated by the secretary of state. Each type of ballot, including mail, provisional, and audio ballots, shall be tested in accordance with rules promulgated by the secretary of state. The tests must ensure that the equipment will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all ballot questions and ballot issues and that the voting system will accurately count ballots of all types.

For all partisan elections, the designated election official shall select a testing board comprising at least two persons, one from each major political party, from the list provided by the major political parties pursuant to section 1-6-102.

For all nonpartisan elections, the designated election official or coordinated election official, as applicable, shall select a testing board comprising at least two persons who are registered electors.

Repealed.

A public test of voting equipment shall be conducted prior to the commencement of voting in accordance with this section by processing a preaudited group of ballots produced so as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each ballot question or ballot issue. The test shall ensure that the system accurately records votes when the elector has the option of voting for more than one candidate in a race. The test shall ensure that the voting system properly rejects and does not count overvotes and undervotes. If the equipment is to be used in an election using instant runoff voting, the test shall ensure that the voting system accurately records, counts, and tabulates an elector's rankings of multiple candidates in accordance with section 1-7-1003 and rules promulgated by the secretary of state.

The public test shall be open to representatives of the political parties, the press, and the public, subject to the rules promulgated by the secretary of state pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. Each major political party, minor political party, ballot issue committee that has an issue on the ballot, and coordinating entity may designate one person, who shall be allowed to witness all public tests and the counting of pretest votes. If an observer or designee hinders or disturbs the test process, the designated election official may remove the person from the test area. An observer or designee who has been removed from a public test may be barred from future tests. The absence of observers or designees shall not delay or stop the public test.

The testing board shall convene and designate at least one member to represent the board during the testing, sign the necessary reports, and report to the board. The programs and ballots used for testing shall be attested to and sealed by the board and retained in the custody of the designated election official. The absence of a member of the testing board shall not delay or stop the test.

Upon completion of the testing conducted pursuant to this section, the testing board or its representative and the representatives of the political parties, ballot issue committees, and coordinating entities who attended the test may witness the resetting of each device that passed the test to a preelection state of readiness and the sealing of each such device in order to secure its state of readiness.

The testing board or its representative shall sign a written statement indicating the devices tested, the results of the testing, the protective counter numbers of each device, if applicable, the number of the seal attached to each device upon completion of the testing, any problems reported to the designated election official as a result of the testing, and whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.

Notice of the fact that the public test will take place shall be posted in the designated public place for posting notices in the county for at least seven days before the public test. The notice shall indicate the general time frame during which the test may take place and the manner in which members of the public may obtain specific information about the time and place of the test. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall preclude the use of additional methods of providing information about the public test to members of the public.

If any tested device is found to have an error in tabulation, it shall be deemed unsatisfactory. For each device deemed unsatisfactory, the testing board shall attempt to determine the cause of the error, attempt to identify and test other devices that could reasonably be expected to have the same error, and test a number of additional devices sufficient to determine that all other devices are satisfactory. The cause of any error detected shall be corrected, and an errorless count shall be made before the voting equipment is approved. The test shall be repeated and errorless results achieved before official ballots are counted.

If an error is detected in the operation or output of an electronic voting device, including an error in spelling or in the order of candidates on a ballot, the problem shall be reported to the testing board and the designated election official. The designated election official shall correct the error.

A voting device deemed unsatisfactory shall be recoded, repaired, or replaced and shall be made available for retesting unless a sufficient number of tested backup devices is available to replace the unsatisfactory device. The backup device may not be used in the election unless the testing board or its representative determines that the device is satisfactory. The designated election official shall announce at the conclusion of the first testing the date, place, and time that an unsatisfactory device will be retested, or, at the option of the testing board, the designated election official shall notify by telephone each person who was present at the first testing of the date, place, and time of the retesting.

The designated election official shall keep records of all previous testing of electronic and electromechanical tabulation devices used in any election. Such records shall be available for inspection and reference during public testing by any person in attendance. The need of the testing board for access to such records during the testing shall take precedence over the need of other attendees for access so that the work of the testing board will not be hindered. Records of testing shall include, for each device, the name of the person who tested the device and the date, place, time, and results of each test. Records of testing shall be retained as part of the official records of the election in which the device is used.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24 prescribing the manner of performing the logic and accuracy testing required by this section. On or before April 1, 2023, the rules promulgated in accordance with this subsection (6) must include standards and procedures for conducting logic and accuracy testing on voting equipment to be used in an election using instant runoff voting.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1404, § 27, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1439, § 27, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1779, § 17, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 833, § 16, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(1)(c)(III) added, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 686, § 31, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 723, § 76, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) and (6) amended, (HB 21-1071), ch. 367, p. 2421, § 13, effective July 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(c)(III)(B) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(c)(III), effective January 1, 2015. (See L. 2012, p. 686.)

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (1)(b) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-7-510. Election software code - escrow - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "election setup records" means the electronic records generated by election tabulation software during election setup to define ballots, tabulation instructions, and other functions related to the election.

At the conclusion of programming and after it has been determined that a voting system is in proper working order and ready for voting, the designated election official shall deposit a copy of the election setup records for a county, statewide, or congressional vacancy election with the secretary of state no later than 5:00 p.m. on the seventh day before the election.

If the election setup records are modified or altered after they are submitted to the secretary of state, the designated election official shall immediately report the change to the secretary of state and deposit the modified election setup records with the secretary of state no later than noon on the day of the election.

The secretary of state shall retain election setup records for six months, after which the secretary of state shall return the election setup records to the designated election official. The designated election official shall retain the election setup records for the period of time for which the designated election official is required to retain official election records.

Election setup records deposited with the secretary of state shall not be used for any purpose, except as directed by the secretary of state or ordered by a court. The tape, diskette, cartridge, or other magnetic or electronic storage medium containing election setup records deposited with the secretary of state shall be kept in a secure location when not being used for an official purpose in accordance with this subsection (5).

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to implement this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, election setup records deposited with the secretary of state pursuant to this section shall not be public records for purposes of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1406, § 27, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1442, § 27, effective June 6.

1-7-511. Election software - voting equipment providers - escrow - definitions.

When a voting system provider submits an electronic or electromechanical voting system for certification pursuant to part 6 of article 5 of this title, the voting system provider shall place in escrow with the secretary of state or an independent escrow agent approved by the secretary of state one copy of the election software being certified and supporting documentation. The voting system provider shall place in escrow any subsequent changes to the escrowed election software or supporting documentation.

An officer of the voting system provider with legal authority to bind the voting system provider shall sign a sworn affidavit that the election software in escrow is the same as the election software being used in its voting systems in this state. The officer shall ensure that the statement is true on a continuing basis.

As an additional requirement for certification, the voting system provider shall deposit one copy of the election software with the national software reference library at the national institute of standards and technology.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., prescribing the manner and procedures that voting system providers shall follow to comply with this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "election software" means the software to be installed or residing on election equipment firmware or on election management computers that controls election setup, vote recording, vote tabulation, and reporting.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, election software and supporting documentation placed in escrow in accordance with this section shall not be public records for purposes of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1407, § 27, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1442, § 27, effective June 6.

1-7-512. Voting system providers - duties.

A voting system provider under contract to provide a voting system to a political subdivision in this state shall:

Notify the secretary of state of the installation of any hardware, firmware, or software prior to the installation or of any change in the election software or the voting system;

Place in escrow with the secretary of state or an independent escrow agent approved by the secretary of state, immediately after the installation of election software, one copy of the state certified election software that was installed in each political subdivision, along with supporting documentation;

Place in escrow with the secretary of state any subsequent changes to the escrowed election software or supporting documentation;

Provide to the secretary of state a sworn statement by an officer of the voting system provider with legal authority to bind the voting system provider attesting that the election software in escrow is the same as the election software certified for use in its voting systems in this state, and ensure that the statement is true on a continuing basis;

Notify the secretary of state and the designated election official of any political subdivision using its voting system of any defect in the same system known to occur anywhere; and

Notify the secretary of state and the designated election official of any political subdivision using its voting system of any change in the election software or the voting system.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., establishing procedures for voting system providers to comply with this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "election software" means the software to be installed or residing on election equipment firmware or on election management computers that controls election setup, vote recording, vote tabulation, and reporting.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1408, § 27, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1443, § 27, effective June 6.

1-7-513. Voting equipment - records.

The designated election official shall maintain separate, detailed records for each component of a voting system used in an election. Such records shall include, but not be limited to, the manufacturer, make, model, serial number, hardware, firmware, software version or release number, date of acquisition, description of services, repairs, maintenance, upkeep, and version upgrades, and date of performance of such services.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., prescribing the manner of maintenance of records required by this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1409, § 27, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1444, § 27, effective June 6.

1-7-513.5. Voting equipment - security.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, no later than June 30, 2023, the designated election official shall keep all components of a voting system in a location where entry is controlled by use of a key card access system. The designated election official shall ensure that the log created by the system is maintained as an election record for twenty-five months following the date of any entry.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, no later than June 30, 2023, the designated election official shall keep all components of a voting system under video security surveillance recording. The designated election official shall ensure that video captured beginning sixty days before through thirty days after an election in which the voting system is used is maintained as an election record for twenty-five months following the election. The designated election official shall ensure that video captured outside this period is maintained for twenty-five months following the date the video was captured.

The designated election official is not required to follow the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section when voting system components are deployed for use or stored at a voting service and polling center.

A county clerk may apply to the secretary of state for a waiver of the requirements of subsection (1) of this section based on historical building status or similar physical limitations. If the secretary finds the clerk has provided an alternative equivalent physical security system for components of a voting system, the secretary of state may grant the waiver.

If the designated election official is unable to satisfy the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section by June 30, 2023, due to delays in the delivery of necessary equipment that are out of the control of the designated election official, the designated election official shall notify and provide proof of the delay to the secretary of state, and the designated election official is required to satisfy the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section as soon as practicable.

The secretary of state may promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this section in accordance with article 4 of title 24.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate:

One million dollars from the general fund to the department of state to administer a grant program, which is hereby created and consists of such general fund appropriation, to provide assistance to counties in complying with the security requirements of the "Colorado Election Security Act"; and

One hundred seventeen thousand dollars from the department of state cash fund to the department of state to assist the state and counties with assessing potential risks to the proper administration of elections.

For the 2023-24 state fiscal year and each state fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall make appropriations from the department of state cash fund to the department of state for the purpose of assisting the state and counties with assessing potential risks to the proper administration of elections.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2281, § 13, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

1-7-514. Random audit.

Following each primary, general, coordinated, or congressional district vacancy election, the secretary of state shall publicly initiate a manual random audit to be conducted by each county. Unless the secretary approves an alternative method for a particular county that is based on a proven statistical sampling plan and will achieve a higher level of statistical confidence, the secretary shall randomly select not less than five percent of the voting devices used in each county to be audited; except that, where a central count voting device is in use in the county, the rules promulgated by the secretary pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall require an audit of a specified percentage of ballots counted within the county.
(1) (a) (I) Following each primary, general, coordinated, or congressional district vacancy election, the secretary of state shall publicly initiate a manual random audit to be conducted by each county. Unless the secretary approves an alternative method for a particular county that is based on a proven statistical sampling plan and will achieve a higher level of statistical confidence, the secretary shall randomly select not less than five percent of the voting devices used in each county to be audited; except that, where a central count voting device is in use in the county, the rules promulgated by the secretary pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall require an audit of a specified percentage of ballots counted within the county.

For an election taking place in a county prior to the date the county has satisfied the requirements of section 1-5-802, the audit shall be for the purpose of comparing the manual tallies of the ballots counted by each voting device selected for each such audit with the corresponding tallies recorded directly by each such device.

For an election taking place in a county on or after the date the county has satisfied the requirements of section 1-5-802, the audit shall be conducted for the purpose of comparing the manual tallies of the voter-verified paper records produced or employed by each voting device selected for such audit with the corresponding ballot tallies recorded directly by each such device in the original election tally.

To the extent practicable, no voting device that is used for the random audit required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be used for conducting the testing of voting devices for recount purposes required by section 1-10.5-102 (3)(a).

Upon completion of the audit required by subsection (1) of this section, if there is any discrepancy between the manual tallies, as specified in accordance with the requirements of subparagraph (II) or (III) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section, as applicable, of the voting device selected for the audit, and the corresponding tallies recorded by such devices, and the discrepancy is not able to be accounted for by voter error, the county clerk and recorder, in consultation with the canvass board of the county established pursuant to section 1-10-101, shall investigate the discrepancy and shall take such remedial action as necessary in accordance with its powers under this title.

Upon receiving any written complaint from a registered elector from within the county containing credible evidence concerning a problem with a voting device, the canvass board along with the county clerk and recorder shall investigate the complaint and take such remedial action as necessary in accordance with its powers under this title.

The canvass board and the county clerk and recorder shall promptly report to the secretary of state a description of the audit process undertaken, including any initial, interim, and final results of any completed audit or investigation conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (2).

The secretary of state shall post the reports of any completed audit or investigation received pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section on the official website of the department of state not later than five business days after receiving the results of the completed audit or investigation. The clerk and recorder of the affected county may timely post the results of the completed audit or investigation on the official website of the county.

Any audit conducted in accordance with the requirements of this section shall be observed by at least two members of the canvass board of the county.

The secretary of state shall promulgate such rules, in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to administer and enforce any requirement of this section, including any rules necessary to provide guidance to the counties in conducting any audit required by this section. The rules shall account for:

The number of ballots cast in the county;

An audit of each type of voting device utilized by the county;

The confidentiality of the ballots cast by the electors; and

An audit of the voting on each office, ballot issue, and ballot question in the election.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1409, § 27, effective June 6; entire section added, p. 1444, § 27, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(III), (2)(c), and (3) amended and (5)(d) added, pp. 1979, 1980, §§ 28, 29, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1335), ch. 260, p. 1194, § 11, effective May 15.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 580, § 46, effective May 18.